Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1621
Conspiracy in restraint of trade; findings; prima facie evidence.

Upon a finding in district court that a conspiracy in restraint of trade existed in an action brought pursuant to section 59-1603 or 59-1604, that finding shall constitute prima facie evidence of the existence of the conspiracy in subsequent civil actions involving the conspiracy.

Laws 1974, LB 1028, § 28.